Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.330

City, town, and district general and special elections—Exceptions.

(1) All city, town, and district general elections shall be held throughout the state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November in the odd-numbered years.

This section shall not apply to:

(a) Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;

(b) Public utility districts, conservation districts, or district elections at which the ownership of property within those districts is a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections shall be held at the times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable thereto;

(c) Consolidation proposals as provided for in RCW 28A.315.235 and nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540 RCW; and

(d) Special flood control districts consisting of three or more counties.

(2) The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon request in the form of a resolution of the governing body of a city, town, or district, presented to the auditor prior to the proposed election date, shall call a special election in such city, town, or district, and for the purpose of such special election he or she may combine, unite, or divide precincts. Such a special election shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by the governing body:

(a) The second Tuesday in February;

(b) The fourth Tuesday in April;

(c) The day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29A.04.311; or

(d) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3) A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section must be presented to the county auditor at least sixty days prior to the election date. A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(c) of this section must be presented to the county auditor no later than the Friday immediately before the first day of regular candidate filing. A resolution calling for a special election on a date set forth in subsection (2)(d) of this section must be presented to the county auditor no later than the day of the primary.

(4) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (d) of this section, a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God, except that no special election may be held between the first day for candidates to file for public office and the last day to certify the returns of the general election other than as provided in subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this section. Such special election shall be conducted and notice thereof given in the manner provided by law.

(5) This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or special in nature, having different dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose of this section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

[ 2015 c 146 s 2; 2013 c 11 s 9; 2011 c 349 s 4. Prior: 2009 c 413 s 4; (2009 c 413 s 3 expired July 1, 2011); 2009 c 144 s 3; 2006 c 344 s 3; 2004 c 266 s 6; 2003 c 111 s 145; 2002 c 43 s 2; 1994 c 142 s 2; 1992 c 37 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 562; 1989 c 4 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 99); 1986 c 167 s 6; 1980 c 3 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 111 s 2; 1965 c 123 s 3; 1965 c 9 s 29.13.020; prior: 1963 c 200 s 1; 1955 c 55 s 1; 1951 c 101 s 1; 1949 c 161 s 1; 1927 c 182 s 1; 1923 c 53 s 2; 1921 c 61 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 5144. Formerly RCW 29.13.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Effective date—2009 c 413 ss 2 and 4: See note following RCW 29A.04.321.

Expiration date—2009 c 413 ss 1 and 3: See note following RCW 29A.04.321.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Intent—2002 c 43: "The legislature finds that there are conflicting interpretations as to the intent of the legislature in the enactment of chapter 305, Laws of 1999. The purpose of this act is to make statutory changes that further clarify this intent.

It is the intent of the legislature that elections of conservation district supervisors continue to be conducted under procedures in the conservation district statutes, chapter 89.08 RCW, and that such elections not be conducted under the general election laws contained in Title 29 RCW. Further, it is the intent of the legislature that there be no change made with regard to applicability of the public disclosure act, *chapter 42.17 RCW, to conservation district supervisors from those that existed before the enactment of chapter 305, Laws of 1999." [ 2002 c 43 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: Provisions in chapter 42.17 RCW relating to public disclosure are recodified in chapter 42.56 RCW by 2005 c 274.

Effective date—2002 c 43: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 14, 2002]." [ 2002 c 43 s 6.]

Effective date—1994 c 142: "This act shall take effect January 1, 1995." [ 1994 c 142 s 3.]

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 111: "If any provision of this 1976 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 111 s 3.]